Hawaii statutes.
[Part xliii.] durable medical equipment
supplier

license program

Note

Part effective January 1, 2017.

[§321-541] Title. This part
shall be known and may be cited as the "durable medical equipment supplier
license program". [L 2016, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next